Nebraska, session 109, LB1035.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1035 LB1035
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 44-7501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-7501 Sections 44-7501 to 44-7535 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and
Form Act.
Sec. 2. For any filing or modification of a rating system for
insurance for homeowners filed with the director on or after July 1,
2026, an insurer may not seek a rate greater than ten percent above the
highest rate approved by the director within the previous twelve calendar
months.
Sec. 3. Section 44-7508, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-7508 (1) Each insurer to which this section applies as provided
in section 44-7506 shall file with the director every rating system and
every modification of such rating system that it chooses to use. Such
rating system shall comply with section 2 of this act. No insurer shall
issue a contract or policy except in accordance with the filings that are
in effect for such insurer as provided in the Property and Casualty
Insurance Rate and Form Act, except:
(a) As provided in subsections (6) and (7) of this section;
(b) As provided by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to section 44-7515; or
(c) For types of inland marine risks that have, by custom of the
industry, not been written according to manual rates or rating plans. For
types of inland marine risks for which the custom of the industry has not
been established, the director shall consider the similarity of the new
insurance to existing types of insurance and classes of risk and whether
it would be reasonably practical to create and file rating systems prior
to use.
(2) Every filing shall state its effective date, which shall not be
prior to the date that the director receives the filing.
-2-

LB1035 LB1035
2026 2026
(3) Every filing shall provide an objective description of the risks
and the coverages to which the rating system will apply. If the insurer
has another rating system on file that applies to some or all of these
same risks, the filing shall disclose this and shall objectively identify
those risks to which each rating system will apply. Filings shall include
a list of manual pages and other rating system elements that will be
replaced when the approval of a filing will result in the replacement or
alteration of previously filed rating systems. In addition, insurers
shall maintain listings of manual pages and other rating system elements
that have been filed with the director so that such listings can be
provided upon request.
(4) Each insurer shall file or incorporate by reference to material
filed with the director all supporting information relating to a rating
system. If a filing is not accompanied by such information or if
additional information is required to complete review of the filing, the
director may require such insurer to furnish the information, and in that
event the review period in subsection (10) of this section shall commence
on the date such information is received by the director. If an insurer
fails to furnish the required information within sixty days, the director
may disapprove the filing based on the insurer's failure to provide the
requested information. Disapproval shall be by written notice sent to the
insurer ordering discontinuance of the filing within thirty days after
the date of notice.
(5) An insurer may authorize the director to accept rating system
filings and prospective loss cost filings made on its behalf by an
advisory organization. The insurer shall file additional information as
is necessary to complete its rating systems on file with the director.
(6) A rate or premium in excess of that provided by a filing
otherwise applicable may be used on any specific risk upon the prior
written consent of the insured that describes the insured's unusual or
extrahazardous exposures that are not otherwise contemplated by the rates
-3-

LB1035 LB1035
2026 2026
on file for that class of risk. Such signed consent shall be filed with
the director no later than thirty days after the effective date of the
insurance to which it applies. Insurers may not use the procedure set
forth in this subsection as a regular means to gain more rate flexibility
than is otherwise allowed by the Property and Casualty Insurance Rate and
Form Act. The director shall monitor such rate applications to assure
compliance with this subsection. The director may, after a hearing,
require by order that such applications for an insurer that has
demonstrated a pattern of using this rating device for risks that do not
possess unusual or extrahazardous exposures or that otherwise fails to
comply with this subsection shall be subject to prior approval pursuant
to subdivision (6)(a) of section 44-7511. Upon application by an insurer
affected by such order, demonstrating that its filings made subsequent to
the order have been in compliance with this subsection, the director
shall vacate such order. The director shall consider any such application
within thirty days after its receipt for any order that has been in
effect for more than nine months since its inception or since it was last
reviewed by the director pursuant to an application by the insurer.
(7) The director may by rules and regulations or by order suspend or
modify the filing requirements of this section as to any type of
insurance or class of risk for which rating systems cannot practicably be
filed before they are used. In making this finding, the director shall
ascertain whether a system of rating classifications and exposure bases
that would equitably reflect the differences in expense requirements and
expected losses between individual risks has been developed or appears
reasonably capable of being developed. The director may examine insurers
as is necessary to ascertain whether any rating systems affected by such
rules and regulations meet the standards contained in this section and in
section 44-7510.
(8) No filing or any supporting information provided pursuant to
this section shall be open to public inspection pursuant to sections
-4-

LB1035 LB1035
2026 2026
84-712 to 84-712.09 before the date on which the director completes
review of the filing unless publicly disclosed in an open court, open
administrative proceeding, or open meeting or disclosed by the director
pursuant to statute. Correspondence specifically relating to individual
risks shall be confidential and may not be made public by the director
except as may be compiled in summaries of such activity.
(9) The director shall review filings as soon as reasonably possible
after they have been submitted. The director shall disapprove a filing
if:
(a) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the The filing
proposes a rating system that would produce inadequate premiums. A
premium level is inadequate if it would endanger the solvency of the
insurer. A premium level that would not be expected to generate a profit
on a direct basis and that would be likely to have the effect of
diminishing competition is also inadequate. A premium level that does not
endanger the solvency of the insurer and is not likely to have the effect
of diminishing competition is not inadequate;
(b) The insurer has more than one rating system applicable to the
line or type of insurance and the insurer fails to specify objective
differences between risks to determine the risks and the coverages to
which the rating system will apply;
(c) The filing proposes to discriminate between risks based on
optional commission differences for agents;
(d) The filing proposes to discriminate between risks based on race,
creed, national origin, or religion of the insured;
(e) The filing would violate the Unfair Discrimination Against
Subjects of Abuse in Insurance Act;
(f) The filing discriminates between risks based on subjective
factors, except that an experience rating plan may use loss reserves
without being considered as subjective; or
(g) The filing proposes to discriminate between risks based solely
-5-

LB1035 LB1035
2026 2026
on the fact that the insured is deployed in the military on Title 10
orders that require the insured to be mobilized outside of the United
States, United States territories, and the District of Columbia for a
period of six months or greater.
(10) Within thirty days after receipt, the director shall disapprove
a filing that requires disapproval pursuant to subsection (9) of this
section, except that this review period may be extended for an additional
period not to exceed thirty days if the director gives written notice
within the original review period to the insurer. A filing shall be
deemed to meet the requirements of this section unless disapproved by the
director within the review period or any extension thereof.
(11) If, within the review period provided by subsection (10) of
this section or any extension thereof, the director finds that a filing
does not meet the requirements of subsection (9) of this section, a
written disapproval notice shall be sent to the insurer. Such notice
shall specify in what respects the filing fails to meet these
requirements and order discontinuance of the filing within thirty days
after the date of notice.
(12) An insurer whose filing is disapproved may, within thirty days
after receipt of a disapproval notice, request a hearing in accordance
with section 44-7532.
(13) If, at any time after the expiration of the review period
provided by subsection (10) of this section or any extension thereof, the
director finds that a rating system or modification thereof does not meet
or no longer meets the requirements of subsection (9) of this section,
the director shall hold a hearing in accordance with section 44-7532.
(14) Any insured aggrieved with respect to any filing may make
written application to the director for a hearing on such filing. The
hearing application shall specify the grounds to be relied upon by the
applicant. If the director finds that the hearing application is made in
good faith, that a remedy would be available if the grounds are
-6-

LB1035 LB1035
2026 2026
established, or that such grounds otherwise justify holding a hearing,
the director shall hold a hearing in accordance with section 44-7532.
(15) If, after a hearing held pursuant to subsection (13) or (14) of
this section, the director finds that a filing does not meet the
requirements of subsection (9) of this section, the director shall issue
an order stating in what respects such filing fails to meet the
requirements and when, within a reasonable period thereafter, such rating
system or aspect of a rating system shall no longer be used. Copies of
the order shall be sent to the applicant, if applicable, and to every
affected insurer and advisory organization. The order shall not affect
any contract or policy made or issued prior to the expiration of the
period set forth in the order.
Sec. 4. Original sections 44-7501 and 44-7508, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-7-